Hawaii statutes.
§171-29 Report to legislature on all
dispositions. (a) The board of land and natural resources shall submit a
written report annually to the legislature within ten days of the convening of
each regular session, of all land dispositions made in the preceding year,
including sales, leases, leases with options to purchase, licenses,
concessions, permits, exchanges, and setting aside of lands by executive
orders, the persons to whom made, the size of each disposition, the purpose for
which made, the land classification of each, the tax map key number, the per
unit price paid or set, and whether the disposition was by auction, by drawing,
or by negotiation. When land originally leased by the board is, in turn,
subleased by the board's lessee or sublessee, the report shall include, in
addition to the foregoing information, the reason for approval of the sublease
by the board and the estimated net economic result accruing to the State,
lessee and sublessee.

(b) Whenever in this chapter any sale, lease,
easement, license, executive order, quitclaim, exchange, or other disposition
is made subject to disapproval of the legislature, a written report thereof
containing the information required in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the legislature in the session next following the date of the
disposition within ten days of the convening of the session. [L 1962, c 32, pt
of §2; Supp, §103A-29; am L 1967, c 234, §8; HRS §171-29; am L 1972, c 173, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next